District of Columbia statutes.
4-1303.05

Medical treatment authorized.

When the Agency has physical custody of a child pursuant to § 4-1303.03 or pursuant to § 16-2313 or § 16-2320, it may:

(1)

Authorize a medical evaluation or emergency medical, surgical, or dental treatment, or authorize an outpatient psychiatric evaluation or emergency outpatient psychiatric treatment, at any time; and

(2)

Authorize non-emergency outpatient medical, surgical, dental or psychiatric treatment, or autopsy, when reasonable efforts to consult the parent have been made but a parent cannot be consulted.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title III, § 305, 24 DCR 3341
Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-277, § 2(q), 48 DCR 2043

History

1981 Ed., § 6-2125.
1973 Ed., § 6-2135.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 13-277, in the lead-in sentence, substituted “Agency has physical custody of a child pursuant to § 4-1303.03” for “Department of Human Services has physical custody of a child pursuant to subsection (b) or (c) of § 4-1303.04”; rewrote par. (1); and, in par. (2), inserted “outpatient”. Prior to amendment, par. (1) read:
“(1) Authorize a medical and psychiatric evaluation and/or emergency medical, surgical, dental, or psychiatric treatment at any time; and”

Effect of Amendments

For applicability of D.C. Law 13-277, see note following § 4-1303.01a.

Editor's Notes